apertium-kaa.kaa.lexc
LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{A%}n V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}tug%{ъ%}ın V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>%{I%}w%>sh%{I%} V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}r V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>%{I%}w GER-INFL ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{A%}n GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{A%}n%>l%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>%{I%}w%>sh%{I%}%>l%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}tug%{ъ%}ın GER-POSSESSIVES ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT-EMPH ;

! Optative/jussive forms
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}y%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%'%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;              ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}y%{I%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}l%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;         ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;

!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}l%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! FIXME check
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}l%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! FIXME check

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}p CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ; ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}sh%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;           ! Dir/LR
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{A%}l%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}p CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{A%}nsh%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

! Verbal Adjectives
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}r GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>s GER-INFL ;

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}r # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>s # ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}r%>l%{I%}k # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>sl%{I%}%{K%} # ;

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ; 

LEXICON V-DER

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}s V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS

! e.g. ko'rin
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /ju%'r, jatir, tur, otir/

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>:%{ъ%} V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>:%{ъ%} V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /жүр, жaтыр, тұр, oтыр/

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF-NEG

%<vaux%>%<neg%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; !USE MT /жaтқaн жoқ/

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ; ! these four verbs in other tenses and all other aux. verbs

LEXICON Copula

e%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:eken GER-POSSESSIVES ;
e%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:eken%>l%{I%}k GER-POSSESSIVES ;

e%<cop%>%<neg%>:emes V-PERS-S1 ;
e%<cop%>%<past%>:eken V-PERS-S1 ;
e%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>:emes% eken V-PERS-S1 ;
e%<cop%>%<ifi%>:e%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-12SG-CASES

%<gen%>:enin%{ъ%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ag%{ъ%}an CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:eni CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:enen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:ende CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:en% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<px%>:eniki%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:endegi ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:endey CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<adv%>:enin%{ъ%}she CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASES-ETC ;
 
LEXICON PersonalPronouns
 
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:men COMMON-CLITICS ;
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:n PRON-12SG-CASES ;

sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:sen COMMON-CLITICS ;
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:s PRON-12SG-CASES ;

ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ol COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:o COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:onın%{ъ%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:og%{ъ%}an COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:onı COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:odan COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:onda COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ol% menen COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<px%>:oniki%{n%} CASES ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ondag%{ъ%}ı ATTR-SUBST ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<sim%>:onday COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:onın%{ъ%}sha COMMON-CLITICS ;

biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:biz PRON-PERS-INFL ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:bizler PRON-PERS-INFL ; ! FIXME
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:bizin%' COMMON-CLITICS ; ! FIXME not sure
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:bizin%{ъ%}she COMMON-CLITICS ;

sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:sizler PRON-PERS-INFL ;
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:sizlershe COMMON-CLITICS ;

olar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:olar PRON-PERS-INFL ;
olaр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:oлaршa COMMON-CLITICS ;

siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:siz PRON-PERS-INFL ;
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>%<adv%>:sizin%{ъ%}she COMMON-CLITICS ;
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:sizler PRON-PERS-INFL ;
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>%<adv%>:sizlershe COMMON-CLITICS ;

!!!!!!!   D E M O N S T R A T I V E

! FIXME CHECK (CLITICS-INCL-COP vs CLIT) I can't imagine forms like "бумын, бусың" etc.
! in Tatar, but not sure how it works in Kazakh /I.S./
!-----
! Good idea is to link prn.dem.sim forms alternatively to CLIT and CASE,
! so that it's "adverbial reading" (e.g. "шундый каты кычкырды") doesn't
! receive <nom> tag /IS/

LEXICON PRON-DEM-INFL

%<gen%>:nın%' CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:g%{ъ%}an CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:nı CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:dan CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:nan CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR FIXME actually only "oсы" seems to take this.
%<abl%>:nnan CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR FIXME
%<loc%>:nda CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<px%>:niki%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:ndag%'ı ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:nday CASES ;  ! FIXME: should have <det>, etc.
%<adv%>:lay CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<qnt%>:nsha CLITICS-NO-COP ;         !

%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

! Commented out till these forms get implemented in tat.lexc too
!%<TD%>:шалық CLITICS-NO-COP ;        ! "that much"  ! FIXME: check cont lex
!%<reas%>%<abl%>:ндықтан # ; ! "because of"  ! FIXME: not attested with oсы?

! FIXME: 1) link the below to PRON-DEM-INFL if possible
!            (later, once we are certain about things)

 LEXICON Verbs
az:az V-IV ; ! ""
aylanıs:aylanıs V-IV ; ! ""
sog%'ıs:sog%'ıs V-IV ; ! ""
albıra:albıra V-IV ; ! ""
salbıra:salbıra V-IV ; ! ""
arlan:arlan V-IV ; ! ""
arqalan:arqalan V-IV ; ! ""
asqın:asqın V-IV ; ! ""
ha%'lsire:ha%'lsire V-IV ; ! ""
atlıq:atlıq V-IV ; ! ""
o%'kirip% jıla:o%'kirip% jıla V-IV ; ! ""
shalıq:shalıq V-IV ; ! ""
ba%'sekiles:ba%'sekiles V-IV ; ! ""
belles:belles V-IV ; ! ""
bol:bol V-IV ; ! ""
pos:pos V-IV ; ! ""
shubalıs:shubalıs V-IV ; ! ""
jasırın:jasırın V-IV ; ! ""
burqılda:burqılda V-IV ; ! ""
rawajlan:rawajlan V-IV ; ! ""
dem% al:dem% al V-IV ; ! ""
u%'mitlen:u%'mitlen V-IV ; ! ""
kir:kir V-IV ; ! ""
eri:eri V-IV ; ! ""
sasqalaqla:sasqalaqla V-IV ; ! ""
bas% tart:bas% tart V-IV ; ! ""
jag%'ımpazlan:jag%'ımpazlan V-IV ; ! ""
janlan:janlan V-IV ; ! ""
jatlıq:jatlıq V-IV ; ! ""
jaqınla:jaqınla V-IV ; ! ""
jet:jet V-IV ; ! ""
jola:jola V-IV ; ! ""
ju%'gin:ju%'gin V-IV ; ! ""
aqsa:aqsa V-IV ; ! ""
izertle:izertle V-IV ; ! ""
a%'bden% sin%':a%'bden% sin%' V-IV ; ! ""
ku%'y:ku%'y V-IV ; ! ""
tirishilik% et:tirishilik% et V-IV ; ! ""
ko%'bey:ko%'bey V-IV ; ! ""
maymıllan:maymıllan V-IV ; ! ""
tın%'la:tın%'la V-IV ; ! ""
aqılsızlan:aqılsızlan V-IV ; ! ""
orna:orna V-IV ; ! ""
an%'satlas:an%'satlas V-IV ; ! ""
sayra:sayra V-IV ; ! ""
samalla:samalla V-IV ; ! ""
satıl:satıl V-IV ; ! ""
semir:semir V-IV ; ! ""
sozılıp% qara:sozılıp% qara V-IV ; ! ""
suw:suw V-IV ; ! ""
sılqılda:sılqılda V-IV ; ! ""
bozar:bozar V-IV ; ! ""
jumsart:jumsart V-IV ; ! ""
tarıl:tarıl V-IV ; ! ""
basıp% bar:basıp% bar V-IV ; ! ""
toz:toz V-IV ; ! ""
duslas:duslas V-IV ; ! ""
tıyın:tıyın V-IV ; ! ""
tıqırla:tıqırla V-IV ; ! ""
tur:tur V-IV ; ! ""
payda% bol:payda% bol V-IV ; ! ""
shap:shap V-IV ; ! ""
shoshan%'la:shoshan%'la V-IV ; ! ""
qabılla:qabılla V-TV-NOPASS ; ! ""
shuwılda:shuwılda V-IV ; ! ""
shırılda:shırılda V-IV ; ! ""
ıqılaslan:ıqılaslan V-IV ; ! ""
ishi% pıs:ishi% pıs V-IV ; ! ""
qayna:qayna V-IV ; ! ""
qal:qal V-IV ; ! ""
qana:qana V-IV ; ! ""
qaran%'g%'ılan:qaran%'g%'ılan V-IV ; ! ""
qatnas:qatnas V-IV ; ! ""
qash:qash V-IV ; ! ""
tigisi% so%'tıl:tigisi% so%'tıl V-IV ; ! ""
qıdır:qıdır V-IV ; ! ""
salbıra:salbıra V-IV ; ! ""
qurılda:qurılda V-IV ; ! ""
qotır% bol:qotır% bol V-IV ; ! ""
biykar% ju%'r:biykar% ju%'r V-IV ; ! ""
qayta% tu%'rlen:qayta% tu%'rlen V-IV ; ! ""
arttır:arttır V-IV ; ! ""
suwıq% al:suwıq% al V-IV ; ! ""
ush:ush V-IV ; ! ""
ha%'leklen:ha%'leklen V-IV ; ! ""
o%'n:o%'n V-IV ; ! ""
o%'s:o%'s V-IV ; ! ""
abayla:abayla V-TV ; ! ""
azayt:azayt V-TV ; ! ""
aynıt:aynıt V-TV ; ! ""
al:al V-TV ; ! ""
alıp% bar:alıp% bar V-TV ; ! ""
quwıp% jet:quwıp% jet V-TV ; ! ""
arala:arala V-TV ; ! ""
arqalat:arqalat V-TV ; ! ""
at:at V-TV ; ! ""
awıstır:awıstır V-TV ; ! ""
aqla:aqla V-TV ; ! ""
baylanıstır:baylanıstır V-TV ; ! ""
qıshırla:qıshırla V-TV ; ! ""
bahala:bahala V-TV ; ! ""
bekit:bekit V-TV ; ! ""
boysın:boysın V-TV ; ! ""
boya:boya V-TV ; ! ""
bu%'k:bu%'k V-TV ; ! ""
pu%'tinle:pu%'tinle V-TV ; ! ""
puta:puta V-TV ; ! ""
dan%'g%'ırlat:dan%'g%'ırlat V-TV ; ! ""
diniy% na%'siyat% ber:diniy% na%'siyat% ber V-TV ; ! ""
ele:ele V-TV ; ! ""
esapla:esapla V-TV ; ! ""
jay:jay V-TV ; ! ""
jalg%'a:jalg%'a V-TV ; ! ""
jap:jap V-TV ; ! ""
sho%'lkemlestir:sho%'lkemlestir V-TV ; ! ""
jaqsıla:jaqsıla V-TV ; ! ""
jeg:jeg V-TV ; ! ""
jetekle:jetekle V-TV ; ! ""
jobala:jobala V-TV ; ! ""
jıy:jıy V-TV ; ! ""
ju%'rgiz:ju%'rgiz V-TV ; ! ""
jo%'nle:jo%'nle V-TV ; ! ""
iyele:iyele V-TV ; ! ""
kes:kes V-TV ; ! ""
gu%'zet:gu%'zet V-TV ; ! ""
ko%'zle:ko%'zle V-TV ; ! ""
mayla:mayla V-TV ; ! ""
gu%'dile:gu%'dile V-TV ; ! ""
mıljala:mıljala V-TV ; ! ""
o%'s:o%'s V-TV ; ! ""
erkelet:erkelet V-TV ; ! ""
or:or V-TV ; ! ""
otlat:otlat V-TV ; ! ""
pisir:pisir V-TV ; ! ""
israp% et:israp% et V-TV ; ! ""
albırat:albırat V-TV ; ! ""
sez:sez V-TV ; ! ""
soz:soz V-TV ; ! ""
suwg%'ar:suwg%'ar V-TV ; ! ""
sır:sır V-TV ; ! ""
su%'r:su%'r V-TV ; ! ""
tan%'la:tan%'la V-TV ; ! ""
tanıt:tanıt V-TV ; ! ""
tart:tart V-TV ; ! ""
tawıs:tawıs V-TV ; ! ""
tekser:tekser V-TV ; ! ""
tolıqtır:tolıqtır V-TV ; ! ""
tuw:tuw V-TV ; ! ""
tıg%'ıl:tıg%'ıl V-TV ; ! ""
tik:tik V-TV ; ! ""
tirilt:tirilt V-TV ; ! ""
tu%'plet:tu%'plet V-TV ; ! ""
gertikle:gertikle V-TV ; ! ""
ta%'rbiyala:ta%'rbiyala V-TV ; ! ""
maydala:maydala V-TV ; ! ""
shal:shal V-TV ; ! ""
kishireyt:kishireyt V-TV ; ! ""
shesh:shesh V-TV ; ! ""
shıtırlat:shıtırlat V-TV ; ! ""
shag%'ılıstır:shag%'ılıstır V-TV ; ! ""
izle:izle V-TV ; ! ""
irilendir:irilendir V-TV ; ! ""
biyzar% qıl:biyzar% qıl V-TV ; ! ""
al:al V-TV ; ! ""
qaras:qaras V-TV ; ! ""
qaq:qaq V-TV ; ! ""
qorla:qorla V-TV ; ! ""
jıyır:jıyır V-TV ; ! ""
qurt:qurt V-TV ; ! ""
uzart:uzart V-TV ; ! ""
ja%'riyala:ja%'riyala V-TV ; ! ""
o%'ndir:o%'ndir V-TV ; ! ""
de:de V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "speak"
ko%'r:ko%'r V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "see"
ko%'r:ko%'rin V-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
al:al Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
pit:pit Vinfl-AUX ; !
ju%'r:ju%'r Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
ket:ket Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
otır:otır Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
tur:tur Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
shıq:shıq Vinfl-AUX ; !
jat:jatır Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! Dir/LR
jat:atır Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
jat:jat Vinfl-AUX ; ! Dir/LR
jat:at Vinfl-AUX ; !  
tur:tur Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
otır:otır Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
